Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-710
Organizational meeting; bylaws; adoption; election of officers; notice; waiver.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation an organization meeting shall be held, at the call of a majority of the incorporators, for the purpose of adopting bylaws and electing officers, and for the transaction of such other business as may properly come before the meeting. The incorporators calling the meeting shall give at least three days' notice thereof by mail to each incorporator, which notice shall state the time and place of the meeting, but such notice may be waived in writing.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 10, p. 206;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-810;

R.S.1943, § 70-710.